Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.090

Animals at large—Limitations—Defense.

Except as provided in chapter 16.24 RCW, a person who owns or has possession, charge, or control of horses, mules, donkeys, cattle, goats, sheep or swine shall not negligently allow them to run at large at any time or within any territory. It shall not be necessary for any person to fence against such animals, and it shall be no defense to any action or proceedings brought pursuant to this chapter or chapter 16.04 RCW that the party injured by or restraining such animals did not have his or her lands enclosed by a lawful fence: PROVIDED, That such animals may be driven upon the highways while in charge of sufficient attendants.

[ 1989 c 286 s 14; 1911 c 25 s 5; RRS s 3072. Formerly RCW 16.12.010, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.